Utah statutes.
26-8a-502.   Illegal activity.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 26-8a-308 or 26-8b-201, a person may not:

(a)  practice or engage in the practice, represent himself to be practicing or engaging in the practice, or attempt to practice or engage in the practice of any activity that requires a license, certification, or designation under this chapter unless that person is so licensed, certified, or designated; or

(b)  offer an emergency medical service that requires a license, certificate, or designation unless the person is so licensed, certified, or designated.

(2)  A person may not advertise or hold himself out as one holding a license, certification, or designation required under this chapter, unless that person holds the license, certification, or designation.

(3)  A person may not employ or permit any employee to perform any service for which a license or certificate is required by this chapter, unless the person performing the service possesses the required license or certificate.

(4)  A person may not wear, display, sell, reproduce, or otherwise use any Utah Emergency Medical Services insignia without authorization from the department.

(5)  A person may not reproduce or otherwise use materials developed by the department for certification or recertification testing or examination without authorization from the department.

(6)  A person may not willfully summon an ambulance or emergency response vehicle or report that one is needed when such person knows that the ambulance or emergency response vehicle is not needed.

(7)  A person who violates this section is subject to Section 26-23-6.

